Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 320.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Ocular devices approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration as a drug,
including but not limited to contact lenses, that contain and deliver pharmaceutical
agents pursuant to a prescription from a physician or osteopath licensed under KRS
Chapter 311 or a licensed optometrist as authorized in KRS 320.240 shall be fitted
by an ophthalmologist licensed as a physician under KRS Chapter 311 or an
optometrist licensed under this chapter.
(2) Ocular devices containing or delivering pharmaceutical agents may be dispensed by
a licensed optometrist as authorized in KRS 320.240 or an ophthalmologist licensed
as a physician under KRS Chapter 311.
(3) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to:
(a) Expand the prescriptive authority of an optometrist licensed under this
chapter; or
(b) Prohibit, limit, or restrict a pharmacist licensed under KRS Chapter 315 from
dispensing a prescription for an ocular device that contains a pharmaceutical
agent.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:17 PM Jacketed